Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 13 Dogs
4-13-10.
Thoroughbred dogs exempt — Kennel licenses.

No license fee is imposed on any thoroughbred dogs kept for breeding and stud purposes only; provided, that the dog is owned by a breeder or annual exhibitor of thoroughbred dogs; and provided, further, that the dogs are kept in a breeding kennel licensed in accordance with the provisions of this section, and only allowed at large in charge of the owner or keeper of that kennel. Every owner or keeper of thoroughbred dogs may make application to the city or town clerk or board of police commissioners or chief of police granting the dog licenses in the town or city in which that kennel is proposed to be located for what shall be known as a kennel license. The application states the name or names of the owner and keeper of the kennel, the proposed location of the kennel, and the number of dogs to be kept; and that the dogs are to be kept only for breeding and stud purposes. If that town or city clerk or board of police commissioners or chief of police deems that the kennel and the use and operation of that kennel at that location would not constitute a public nuisance, he, she, or they shall issue a kennel license authorizing the owner or keeper to keep the kennel in the definite location to be specified in the license, upon the payment by the applicant of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the license. Every kennel license is for a period not exceeding one year and expires on the first day of April. All moneys received shall be credited to the dog fund of the town or city. Any person without a kennel license who establishes or keeps a kennel shall be fined not exceeding five dollars ($5.00) for each day the kennel is kept.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 111, § 28; P.L. 1897, ch. 462, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 28; P.L. 1915, ch. 1240, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 28; P.L. 1925, ch. 645, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-10

; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1.

4-13-11.
Annual census of dogs — List of licenses issued.

The city or town sergeant of each city or town, or any special constables as the city or town council of the city or town may appoint, annually in the month of April, shall ascertain and make a list of the owners or keepers of dogs in the city or town and return the list to the city or town clerk on or before the last day of May. The sergeant or constables shall receive from the city or town treasury the sum of twenty cents (20¢) for each dog listed, except in the city of Providence, where the special constable shall receive from the city treasurer a sum fixed by the city council of the city for each dog listed. The city or town clerk shall within two (2) weeks thereafter furnish to the city or town sergeant or to each special constable appointed and sworn a list of all dogs licensed for the current year and a list of those not licensed, with the names of the owners or keepers, and shall, except in the cities of Newport and Providence, post the list in at least three (3) public places in the city or town or publish the list in any other manner as the city or town council may direct. This section does not apply to the city of Pawtucket insofar as special provision is made for that city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 12; P.L. 1897, ch. 453, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 12; P.L. 1932, ch. 1951, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-11

.

4-13-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 13; P.L. 1897, ch. 453, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-12

; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 270, § 1, effective June 19, 1985.

4-13-13.
Wrongful removal of collar — Theft or destruction of licensed dogs — Poisoning.

Whoever wrongfully removes the collar from the neck of a dog licensed and collared according to the provisions of this chapter, or steals a dog licensed or collared, or kills, maims, entices, carries away, or detains a licensed dog, or distributes or exposes a poisonous substance, with the intent that the poisonous substance shall be eaten by a licensed dog, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both, and shall be liable to the dog’s owner for damages in a civil action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-13

; P.L. 1969, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 434, § 1.

4-13-14.
Licensing by police authorities.

The duties imposed on town and city clerks by this chapter shall be performed by the boards of police commissioners, respectively, in the cities and towns where these boards grant the dog licenses, and in the city of Newport by the chief of police of that city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 26; P.L. 1915, ch. 1240, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-14

.

4-13-15.
Collaring of dogs — Impoundment and disposition of uncollared dogs.

Every owner or keeper of a dog shall cause the dog to wear a collar around its neck distinctly marked with its owner’s or keeper’s name and with its registered number. Any person may cause any dog not so collared to be impounded in the public pound of the town or city where the dog is found; and if the dog is not claimed by its owner or keeper within a period of five (5) days after the impoundment, the dog may be disposed of or destroyed. The five (5) days shall not include any day or part of a day that the public pound is not open for a specified period of time, not to be less than one-half (1/2) the normal hours of business, for the purpose of reclaiming any impounded dog by its rightful owner. All periods of time shall be listed in a prominent location at the entrance to all public pounds. The owner or keeper of any dog so impounded shall not take the dog out of the pound until he or she has first paid to the poundkeeper the expense of keeping the dog, that expense not to exceed two dollars ($2.00) per day and to be determined by the city or town council in which impoundment occurs. The town council of the town of Glocester may, by ordinance, determine an expense not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for each of the first five (5) days during which this impoundment occurs plus five dollars ($5.00) every day the animal is detained, plus an additional ten dollars ($10.00) if the owner or keeper is unable to show that the dog has a current rabies shot pursuant to §

4-13-31

, and further, the dog shall not be released from the pound until all the provisions of this chapter and the ordinances of the city or town are complied with. The provisions of this section relating to the five-day (5) waiting period shall not be deemed to apply to any dog which, when impounded, was injured or maimed, and after the dog has been examined by a licensed veterinarian who shall confirm, in writing, that the dog be destroyed for humanitarian purposes.

The town of West Warwick may provide by ordinance an impounding fee of five dollars ($5.00) per day and may provide by ordinance for a fee for the purposes of transferring ownership or for the disposition of said animals according to law for each adult dog (six (6) months or older) the sum of twenty dollars ($20.00) and for each puppy the sum of five dollars ($5.00) and for each adult cat (six (6) months or older) the sum of ten dollars ($10.00).

Any person violating the provisions of this section is subject to the penalty provisions of §

4-1-2

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) the town council of the town of Exeter may impose an initial impoundment fee of up to fifteen dollars ($15.00) plus two dollars ($2.00) per day for each day of impoundment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the city council of the city of East Providence is authorized to enact an ordinance imposing an initial impoundment fee of up to twenty dollars ($20.00) plus five dollars ($5.00) per day for each day of impoundment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the town council of the town of Richmond is authorized to enact an ordinance providing for an impoundment fee of not more than twenty dollars ($20.00) per day for any impounded animal, and requiring payment of the fee before an impounded animal may be released to its owner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the Foster town council is authorized to enact an ordinance providing for an impoundment fee of not more than fifteen dollars ($15.00) per day for any impounded animal, and requiring payment of the fee before an impounded animal may be released to its owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 4; P.L. 1911, ch. 666, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-15

; P.L. 1970, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 59, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 401, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 51, § 1.

4-13-15.1.
Ordinances concerning unrestricted and vicious dogs prohibited — Leash laws.

City or town councils may make any ordinances concerning dogs in their cities or towns as the councils deem expedient, pertaining to the conduct of dogs, which ordinances shall include regulations relating to unrestricted dogs, leash laws, confinement, and destruction of vicious dogs. Those ordinances may provide as follows:

Every owner or custodian of a dog shall cause that dog not to run unrestricted anywhere in the city or town. This section does not apply to any person who uses a dog under his or her direct supervision while lawfully hunting, while engaged in a supervised formal obedience training class or show or during formally sanctioned field trials.

It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to place that dog or allow it to be placed in the custody of any other person not physically capable of maintaining effective control of restricting the dog.

The city or town dog officer is empowered to seize and impound any dog found off the property of its owner or custodian when that dog is unrestricted.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not exceeding two hundred and fifty dollars ($250).

The town council of the town of Westerly is authorized to enact an ordinance permitting the animal control officer in that town to issue citations to the owner of any dog found off the property of its owner or custodian and to prescribe a pecuniary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each violation.

The town council of the town of Exeter is authorized to enact an ordinance imposing an initial fee of up to fifteen dollars ($15.00) for the impoundment of a dog plus two dollars ($2.00) per day for each day of impoundment. The town of Exeter may also, in addition to the fines provided for under subsection (a)(4) of this section and under any other provision of law, require proof of liability insurance for a twelve (12) month period in the amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for third time offenders of its animal control ordinances. Said insurance policy shall cover injuries and damages caused by the dog and shall, for purposes of notice, name the town as an additional insured.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 35, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 275, § 1.

4-13-16.
Action for damages to animals — Double damages on second recovery — Destruction of offending dog.

If any dog kills, wounds, worries, or assists in killing, wounding or worrying, any sheep, lamb, cattle, horse, hog, swine, fowl, or other domestic animal belonging to or in the possession of any person, or assaults, bites, or otherwise injures any person while traveling the highway or out of the enclosure of the owner or keeper of that dog, the owner or keeper of the dog shall be liable to the person aggrieved, for all damage sustained, to be recovered in a civil action, with costs of suit. If afterwards any such damage is done by that dog, the owner or keeper of the dog shall pay to the party aggrieved double the damage, to be recovered in the manner set forth and an order shall be made by the court before whom that second recovery is made, for killing the dog. The order shall be executed by the officer charged with the execution of the order, and it shall not be necessary, in order to sustain this action, to prove that the owner or keeper of the dog knew that the dog was accustomed to causing this damage.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-16

.

Form of Action.

Action for injuries resulting from being bitten by a dog while traveling on the highway could be brought either in trespass or on the case. Barlow v. Tierney,

26 R.I. 557

, 59 A. 930,

1905 R.I. LEXIS 9

(1905) (Decision prior to adoption of Rules of Civil Procedure providing for one form of action).

There was no variance between writ and declaration in suit for damages due to dog bite for failure of declaration to allege that dog bite was vi et armis, et contra pacem, since form of action was trespass in both writ and declaration. Barlow v. Tierney,

26 R.I. 557

, 59 A. 930,

1905 R.I. LEXIS 9

(1905) (Decision prior to adoption of Rules of Civil Procedure providing for one form of action).

4-13-16.1.
Injury to seeing-eye dogs or persons who are visually impaired— Damages.

If any dog kills, wounds, or worries, or assists in killing, wounding, or worrying, any seeing-eye dog certified for use as a guide-dog for a person who is blind or visually impaired, belonging to or in the possession of any person who is blind or visually impaired and under harness or engaged in the act of guiding its owner, or if any dog assaults, bites, or otherwise injures any person who is blind or visually impaired while traveling the highway or out of the enclosure of the owner or keeper of that dog, the owner or keeper of the dog shall be liable to the person who is blind or visually impaired aggrieved for double all damages sustained, to be recovered in a civil action, with costs of suit. If afterwards this damage is done by that dog, the owner or keeper of the dog shall pay to the party aggrieved treble damages, to be recovered in the same manner, and an order shall be made by the court before whom the second recovery is made, for killing the dog. The order shall be executed by the officer charged with the execution of the order and it shall not be necessary, in order to sustain this action, to prove that the owner or keeper of this dog knew that the dog was accustomed to causing these damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 1.

4-13-17.
Civil liability of person harboring dog for damages.

Any person keeping or harboring in his or her house or on his or her lands any dog, or knowingly suffering this to be done by any other person, shall be liable for all damages done by the dog in the same manner as if he or she were the owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-17

.

4-13-18.
Destruction of dogs in defense of person or livestock.

Any person may kill any dog that suddenly assaults him or her or any person of his or her family or in his or her company, while the person assaulted is out of the enclosure of the owner or keeper of that dog and any person may kill any dog found out of the enclosure of its owner or keeper, assaulting, wounding, or killing any cattle, sheep, lamb, horse, hog, or fowl, not the property of its owner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-18

; P.L. 1981, ch. 374, § 1.

4-13-19.
Order to confine or kill vicious dog — Subsequent damages.

If any person, or any member of his or her family shall be assaulted by any dog, out of the enclosure of its owner or keeper, or if any person shall have reason to believe that any dog will, out of that enclosure, do any injury to his or her person, family or property, and shall make complaint under oath, to any judge of the district court, that judge shall issue a summons to the owner or keeper of the dog, to appear before the division of the district court having jurisdiction of the case; and if, on examination, the court shall believe that the assault is proved, or that the complaint has reasonable grounds for the belief, it shall adjudge, and shall adjudge that the defendant pay costs of the proceedings and award execution of the proceedings, otherwise the costs shall be paid by the complainant; and the court shall issue written notice to the owner or keeper, and the owner or keeper shall forthwith confine or kill the dog; and if he or she neglects to kill the dog or keep the dog confined, he or she shall forfeit the sum of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), to be recovered for the use of the city or town, and any person may kill the dog; and if, after that notice, the dog wounds or injures any person, or shall, elsewhere than on its owner’s or keeper’s premises, worries, wounds or kills any neat-cattle, sheep, lamb, geese or fowl, or does any other mischief, the owner or keeper is liable to pay the person injured triple damages with costs; and in all cases of complaints under this section recognizance shall be given for costs, and the fees and costs shall be the same as in other cases of complaints before the district court.

The district court judge may, in his or her discretion, if the court determines the dog, while out of the enclosure of its owner or keeper, has assaulted a person or killed a domesticated animal and is dangerous, order the detention or destruction of the dog.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-19

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 46; P.L. 1980, ch. 249, § 1.

4-13-20.
Appraisal of damages done by dogs.

Each town or city council, excepting the town and city councils in the cities of Newport and Pawtucket and in the towns of Jamestown, Little Compton, New Shoreham, Tiverton, Exeter, and Burrillville shall annually in the month of April appoint one or more suitable persons as appraisers, who shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their duties, to appraise the damage that may be done to any owner of any sheep, goats or lambs, cattle or horses, hogs or fowls, closely confined game birds, or closely confined rabbits suffering loss by reason of the biting, maiming, or killing by any dog or dogs, and to give a statement in writing to the owner suffering the loss; and the owner, suffering loss, shall, within two (2) days after the loss comes to his or her knowledge, notify the appraiser, appointed and sworn, living nearest to him or her in the city or town where the damage occurred, of the loss; and the appraiser shall, on receipt of twenty-five cents (25¢) for each mile’s travel (or, in the towns of Middletown and Portsmouth, twenty cents (20¢) for each mile’s travel) and the sum of one dollar ($1.00) from the owner, appraise the damage and give a statement in writing, with his or her lawful fees taxed thereon, to the owner; and the owner shall, within sixty (60) days, present the statement to the city or town council of the city or town, who shall draw an order on the city or town treasurer for the amount of the appraisal and fees, or for any other amount as the council, in the council’s discretion, after careful examination, shall deem just; and the order, when presented to the city or town treasurer, shall be paid in the same manner as any other order made by the city or town council upon the city or town treasurer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 15; P.L. 1932, ch. 1942, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1951, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2233, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2323, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-20

; P.L. 1962, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 455, § 1.

4-13-21.
Appraisal and payment of damages in certain Newport county towns.

Each town or city council in the county of Newport, except in the towns of Middletown and Portsmouth, shall annually in the month of April appoint one or more suitable persons appraisers, who shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their duties, to appraise the damage that may be done to any owner of any sheep or lambs, cattle, horses, hogs, goats, or fowls, suffering loss by reason of the biting, maiming, or killing by any dog, and to give a statement in writing to the owner suffering loss; and the owner, suffering loss shall within two (2) days after the loss comes to his or her knowledge, notify the appraiser, appointed and sworn, living nearest to him or her in the city or town where the owner resides, of the loss; and the appraiser shall, on receipt of twenty cents (20¢) for each mile’s travel and the sum of one dollar ($1.00) from the owner, appraise the damage and give a statement in writing, with his or her lawful fees taxed thereon, to the owner; and the owner shall, within sixty (60) days, present to the town or city council of the town or city where the damage is done the appraisal, and the town or city council of the town or city shall draw an order on the town or city treasurer for the amount of the appraisal and fees, or for any other amount as the council, in the council’s discretion, after careful examination, shall deem just. The town or city treasurer shall annually, on the last Monday in March, pay all those orders in full, if the gross amount received by the town or city under the provisions of this chapter, after deducting all sums previously laid out under those provisions, is sufficient; otherwise the town or city treasurer shall divide the amount, after deducting the sums, pro rata among the orders, and the payment shall be in full discharge of the orders.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 16; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2233, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-21

; P.L. 1962, ch. 7, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 31, § 1.

4-13-22.
Subrogation of town or city to claim for damages.

Upon drawing an order as provided in §§

4-13-20

and

4-13-21

, the town or city may recover, in a civil action against the keeper or owner of any dog involved in the damage, full compensation for the damage done by his or her dog and costs of appraisal. Should the person suffering loss avail himself or herself of the provisions in §§

4-13-20

—

4-13-22

, he or she shall not be entitled to maintain a suit for damages against the owner or keeper of the dog.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-22

.

Form of Action.

Action by the town against the dog owner under this section sounds in tort and not in contract. Richmond v. James,

27 R.I. 154

, 61 A. 54,

1905 R.I. LEXIS 57

(1905).

4-13-23.
Sworn testimony before appraiser.

Whenever any owner of a sheep or lamb, cattle, horse, hog or fowl, suffering loss by reason of the biting, maiming or killing by any dog, notifies the appraiser as provided in §§

4-13-20

and

4-13-21

, the appraiser shall require the owner and any other person to be sworn before him or her, touching the loss, and, when sworn, to answer in writing as to any facts or circumstances relating to the loss, and the special constable or appraiser shall administer the oath.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-23

.

4-13-24.
Penalty for neglect of duties.

Any person appointed under the provisions of this chapter who qualifies himself or herself to act, and every city or town clerk and every city or town council, who willfully neglects to perform any of the duties imposed upon him, her, or them by the provisions, shall forfeit one hundred dollars ($100) for the use of any person who sues for the penalty.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-24

.

4-13-25.
Election of special constable and appraiser in Pawtucket.

The council of the city of Pawtucket shall in the month of February in each year elect a special constable under the dog law, and an appraiser of damage done by dogs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1951, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-25

.

4-13-26 — 4-13-28.
Repealed.

4-13-29.
Quarantine to suppress rabies — Report of cases.

The rabies control board of Rhode Island is empowered to issue any rules and regulations not contrary to law that may be necessary in setting the terms and conditions of each type of quarantine or to quarantine any area or areas within the state that the board may from time to time deem necessary for the purpose of prevention, controlling, or suppressing rabies. The rabies control board is authorized to quarantine any animal suspected of harboring rabies and/or to delegate the authority to quarantine dogs, cats, and ferrets suspected of harboring rabies to local animal control officers (ACO) or other representatives authorized by the municipality. The board or its agents are authorized to seek a warrant from a court of competent jurisdiction for entry to any premises, public or private, where probable cause exists that a violation of this section and/or §

4-13-31

is occurring within or about the premises. Notification shall be given immediately to the board or any of its members by any person or persons, including but not limited to veterinarians, licensed to practice in this state, and city or town health officials, upon the detection by them of an animal suspected to be affected with rabies.

Any appeal from an order of quarantine shall be to the superior court of Providence County or in the county in which the cause of action arose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 136, § 33; P.L. 1930, ch. 1597, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-29

; P.L. 1992, ch. 353, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 1.

4-13-29.1.
Responsibility for local rabies control.

Each city and town is required to provide for the control of rabies in cats, dogs, and ferrets within its boundaries. The municipality may elect to adopt into ordinance provisions at least as stringent as this chapter and the regulations adopted by the board or it may choose to accept delegation of the authority of the board as provided in §

4-13-29

. The rabies control board has the authority to institute a civil action to enforce the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 2.

4-13-29.2.
Exemption from liability.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, neither the rabies control board, any member of the board, the state or any of the state’s subdivisions, or any person acting as their agent, is subject to civil liabilities or penalties of any type, arising out of their actions performed in the course of their duties pursuant to this chapter. Nothing in this section is to be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages resulting from the person’s gross negligence or from the person’s reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 2.

4-13-29.3.
Regulations for suppression of rabies.

The rabies control board has the authority to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the functions required to prevent, control, or suppress rabies and every person who fails to comply with any regulation made shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 2.

4-13-30.
[Obsolete.]

4-13-31.
Compulsory rabies vaccination.

For the purpose of preventing the introduction of rabies when rabies appears in any nearby area and its appearance creates a threat of introduction into Rhode Island, or for the suppression, or for the control of rabies, the board shall make regulations requiring compulsory vaccination of dogs, cats, ferrets or any other domestic animal as deemed necessary against rabies in a manner specified by it in any area or areas within the state, which are deemed necessary to prevent that introduction, or for the purposes of suppression and control.

The board is authorized to engage any personnel within the department of health or department of environment to assist in carrying out any regulation which may be promulgated for the suppression and control of rabies.

Upon receipt of a written request from any city or town council or the mayor of any town or city and with the consent and approval of the health officers of those towns and cities, the board shall establish in cooperation with local and state health department authorities, public clinics for the vaccination of dogs, cats, and ferrets against rabies. Those clinics shall be conducted in accordance with provisions and regulations proposed by and under the supervision of the board.

Rabies vaccine for animals may be administered only by or under the direct and specific supervision of a licensed veterinarian.

Except as otherwise amended by board regulation, the owner or keeper of a dog, cat, or ferret shall have the animal vaccinated not earlier than three (3) months of age nor later than four (4) months of age and at regular intervals as prescribed by board regulations, but at no time to exceed recommendations made by the most current compendium of animal rabies control.

Any veterinarian or any person directed by a veterinarian who vaccinates a dog, cat, or ferret against rabies must issue a rabies vaccination certificate to the animal’s owner. This certificate shall meet the minimum standards approved by the board, which include: the veterinarian’s name, the veterinarian’s practice name, address and telephone number; the pet owner’s name and address, the pet’s name, species, age coloration and sex; the rabies vaccine manufacturer’s name; the date of inoculation and the signature of the doctor who administered or directed the administration of the rabies vaccine. For dogs, cats, and ferrets, there shall be a record kept which lists the number of the rabies tag issued in conjunction with the rabies vaccination certificate.

No city or town may register or license a pet that is not vaccinated for rabies in accordance with this chapter. Proof of rabies vaccination shall be a current, valid rabies certificate for any species.

This chapter shall not apply to any dog or cat imported into this state strictly for exhibition or breeding purposes, and which does not remain in this state for more than fifteen (15) days and which is accompanied by a valid health certificate or certificate of veterinary inspection.

A person who fails to have or refuses to have each dog, cat, and/or ferret owned or kept by the person vaccinated against rabies violates the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 639, § 34; P.L. 1954, ch. 3364, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-31

; P.L. 1958, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 12; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 353, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 1.

4-13-32.
Penalty for violation of rabies suppression provisions.

Any person violating the provisions of §§

4-13-29

and

4-13-31

shall be charged with a misdemeanor and fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense or be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days and/or be subject to confiscation of the animal(s) which is/are the basis of the violation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 136, § 35; P.L. 1930, ch. 1597, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-32

; P.L. 1992, ch. 353, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 388, § 1.

4-13-33.
Agent of society for prevention of cruelty as special constable.

The board of police commissioners of any city, and the city council and town council of any city or town where there is no board of police commissioners, may appoint an agent of the Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals as special constable or officer to enforce this chapter, and when appointed that agent shall have all the authority and power and be subject to all the duties and liabilities imposed upon special officers by this chapter. The general agent or any special agent of The Rhode Island society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shall have the authority to enforce this chapter whenever any violation of this chapter comes to the attention of that general agent or special agent.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 141, § 20; P.L. 1927, ch. 1037, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-33

; P.L. 1986, ch. 429, § 4.

4-13-34.
Correction of defects in prosecutions.

Any defect in any action, complaint and warrant, indictment or other proceeding commenced and prosecuted under this chapter, either of form or substance, may be amended by the court before which the action, complaint and warrant or indictment is originally brought or may be pending.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-34

.

4-13-35.
Immunity of officers from costs.

No officer making complaint under this chapter shall be required to give surety for costs, or be liable for the costs that may arise upon any complaint brought under this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 111, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 135, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 136, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 639, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

4-13-35

.

4-13-36.
Agent of Robert Potter league for animals in town of Portsmouth as special constable.

The town council of the town of Portsmouth may appoint an agent of the Robert Potter league for animals as special constable or officer to enforce this chapter, and when appointed, that agent shall have all the authority and power and be subject to all the duties and liabilities imposed upon special officers by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 79, § 1.

4-13-37.
Agent of Robert Potter league for animals in town of Middletown as special constable.

The town council of the town of Middletown may appoint an agent of the Robert Potter league for animals as special constable or officer to enforce this chapter, and when appointed, that agent shall have all the authority and power and be subject to all the duties and liabilities imposed upon special officers by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 119, § 1.

4-13-38.
Dogs attacking deer.

A person owning, keeping or possessing a dog shall not allow, permit or consent to this dog chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing a deer. The director of environmental management is authorized to issue an order to restrain all dogs from running at large in any city or town where, in the director’s opinion, this restraining order is necessary to prevent dogs from chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing deer. This order shall be in effect forty-eight (48) hours after publication in one or more newspapers circulated in the city or town. When, in the director’s opinion, the director determines that this restraining order is no longer necessary, the director shall, by publication, rescind this order. A person owning, keeping, or possessing a dog shall restrain it from running at large in any city or town in which this restraining order is in effect. The chief of the division of enforcement, the chief’s assistants, conservation officers, members of the state police, members of the local police, in areas over which they have jurisdiction, may issue a citation to the owner of any dog found chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing a deer, charging the owner with a violation of this chapter. During any period when this order is not in force, the chief of the division of enforcement, the chief’s assistants, conservation officers and members of the state police and members of the local police and park police in areas over which they have jurisdiction, may issue a citation to the owner of any dog found chasing or hunting a deer if the dog is chasing or hunting with the knowledge or consent of the owner. Whenever a dog has been found chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing a deer and the owner or keeper of the dog has been notified by the director, and the same dog is found chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing, it shall be prima facie evidence that this chasing, hunting, molesting, attacking, or killing was with the knowledge or consent of the owner or keeper.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 586, § 1.

4-13-39.
Penalties.

Any person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall be fined fifty dollars ($50) for a first offense and one hundred dollars ($100) for a second and subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 586, § 1.

4-13-40.
Exemptions from application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do not apply to K-9 and/or other dogs owned by any police department or any law enforcement officer which are used in the performance of police work.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 417, § 1.

4-13-41.
Use of the terms owner or guardian.

Wherever the word “owner” shall appear in this chapter it shall also mean and may be interchanged with the word “guardian” as defined in §

4-13-1.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 3.